Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Apportionment

6.010.
Senatorial districts. [Repealed.]

6.011.
Senatorial districts. [Repealed.]

6.020.
New counties.

Any new county created before the next apportionment of representation shall, for the purpose of representation, be considered as part of the district from which the greater part of its territory was taken.

History.

2001.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Redistricting of state, Ky. Const., § 33.

6.030.
Representative districts. [Repealed.]

6.031.
Representative districts. [Repealed.]

6.040.
Construction of KRS 6.010 and 6.030. [Repealed.]

6.041.
Construction of KRS 6.011 and 6.031. [Repealed.]